Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-642
Birth or death certificates; medical certification; amendment; requirements.

All items in the medical certification or of a medical nature in a vital record may be amended only upon receipt of a signed statement from those responsible for completion of the entries involved as provided in the Vital Statistics Act. The department may, at its discretion, require documentary evidence to substantiate the requested amendment.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 167;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 28.